Massachusetts, session 194th, H138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 17. Section 1A of chapter 128 of the General Laws is hereby amending by
inserting, at the end of said section, the following:-
This section shall not apply to the raising of dogs or cats for breeding, the raising or
keeping of dogs or cats for other commercial use, or to the commercial grooming of dogs or cats.
of 1